Mississippi statutes. Title 47. Prisons and Prisoners; Probation and Parole
Operation, Management and Personnel
§ 47-5-77.
Remission to State Treasurer of funds belonging to correctional system; payment of bills and accounts of correctional system.

The commissioner shall remit to the State Treasurer all moneys belonging to the correctional system received by him in accordance with the provisions of Section 7-9-21. All bills and accounts of said correctional system shall be paid from appropriations made by the Legislature upon sworn accounts and warrants drawn by the State Fiscal Management Board on the State Treasurer in the same manner as provided by general law. Each account shall be approved by the commissioner or, in the commissioner’s absence, by his designee.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7935; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 15; Laws, 1974, ch. 539, § 23; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 42; reenacted Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 42; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 37; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 223; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 37; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 20, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1988).

§ 47-5-78.
Creation of the “Lambert State Forest Revolving Fund.”

There is established within the State Treasury a revolving fundto fund forest management costs provided under Sections 47-5-56 and 47-5-66 for the Lambert State Forest in Quitman County and shall be disbursed as provided in those sections. The fund shall be called the “Lambert State Forest Revolving Fund,” and moneys for the fund shall accrue from any revenues derived from the Lambert State Forest including, but not limited to, timber sales and any other revenue derived from forest management practices. The State Treasurer shall invest all monies in the fund, and interest earned on the investments shall be paid back into the fund and not into the General Fund. The fund shall be audited annually by the State Auditor.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 337, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 362, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 17, 2000.).

§ 47-5-79.
How purchases to be made.

All contracts for the purchase of materials, supplies, equipment and sustenance for the offenders of the correctional system shall be made under the provisions of the state purchasing law, same being Sections 31-7-1 through 31-7-55.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7937; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 17; Laws, 1966, ch. 378, § 2; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 43; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 43; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 38; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 38, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§§ 47-5-81,
47-5-83.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1976, ch. 440, § 92, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

[Laws, 1964, ch. 378, §§ 63, 39]

§ 47-5-85.
Chapel for religious worship; chaplain.

There shall be provided an area at each facility of the correctional system for religious worship to be conducted by the chaplain’s office of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. The chaplains will have ingress and egress to all facilities of the Mississippi Department of Corrections for the purpose of providing religious services to the offenders incarcerated therein.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7975; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 55; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 44; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 44; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1984, ch. 385; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 39; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 39, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-87.
No gasoline or motor oil to be sold.

No gasoline or motor oil shall be sold for personal use by the state correctional system to any of its employees. Gasoline shall be delivered only in tank truck or tank car lots in such quantities as the commissioner may deem necessary, and motor oil in such quantities as may be needed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7982; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 62; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 45; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 45; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 40; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 40, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-89.
No solicitation nor contribution for political purposes.

If any officer or employee of the state or county government, or any employee of the state correctional system, or any other person shall solicit or accept from any employee of the state correctional system, or from any offender therein, any contribution of money or other property for political or election purposes he shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and on conviction shall be fined not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or imprisoned in the county jail not less than sixty (60) days nor longer than one hundred twenty (120) days, or both, and if an employee of the state correctional system he shall be immediately and permanently removed from further employment with the state correctional system.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7984; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 64; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 46; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 46; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 41; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 41, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-91.
Transportation of children of employees to school; payment of tuition.

The commissioner is authorized and directed to provide for transportation of children of employees of the Mississippi State Penitentiary both in Sunflower County and Quitman County to a public elementary or secondary school located in those counties and to pay for such transportation out of the support and maintenance fund of the department of correction. The commissioner shall further pay to any public elementary or secondary school located in said counties which said children are sent, an amount not to exceed Sixty Dollars ($60.00) per student per month as tuition, which also shall be paid out of the support and maintenance fund of the department of correction. Any student who receives benefits under this section shall not be eligible for any other educational financial state grant or loan.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7967; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 47; Ex Sess, 1969, ch. 36, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 404; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 63; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 47; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 42; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 42, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-93.
Governor to make inspections.

It shall be the duty of the Governor to make personal inspection of the central facilities of the state correctional system and offenders twice during each and every year at such times as may suit his convenience, and without previous notice to the commissioner, and the commissioner, when required so to do, shall afford all necessary facilities for making such inspection.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7969; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 49; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 47; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 48; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 43; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 43, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-94.
Annual structural and environmental inspections; report of findings.

The Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management of the Department of Finance and Administration and the State Board of Health are hereby authorized and directed, upon the passage of this section, to institute permanent annual structural and environmental inspections of institutional housing and service facilities at the State Penitentiary, such inspections to include but not be limited to, structural soundness, repairs and maintenance of buildings; food service; fire and safety hazards; fresh water supply; wastewater system; sewage collection and treatment; solid waste collection, storage and disposal; rodent and pest control and general institutional housekeeping.

All other state agencies, authorities, boards, commissions and departments are hereby directed, upon the request of the Commissioner of Corrections, the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management of the Department of Finance and Administration or the State Board of Health, to assist in such inspections with the fullest degree of reasonable cooperation.

Within thirty (30) days of the completion of the inspections provided for herein, the participants shall compile a written report of their findings which shall be submitted to the Governor, the Commissioner of Corrections and the Warden or Superintendent of the State Penitentiary at Parchman.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 447, § 2; brought forward, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 49; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 44; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 44; Laws, 1994, ch. 480, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 47-5-95.
Officials to be admitted to places where offenders kept and worked; visitors to correctional system facilities.

The members of the executive department, except the Governor and Lieutenant Governor, and judicial departments of the state and members of the Legislature, shall with advance notice to the commissioner be admitted into the correctional system or any facility thereof, and other places where offenders are kept and worked, at all proper hours, for the purpose of observing the conduct thereof, and may hold conversations with the offenders apart from all correctional system officials. Other persons may visit a correctional system facility under such rules and regulations as may be established by the commissioner who shall be liable to the state on his bond for negligence in security and in an amount to be determined by the courts.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7950; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 30; Laws, 1974, ch. 539, § 24; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 48; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 50; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 45; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 45, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-97.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 92, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

[Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 68]

§ 47-5-99.
Creation of classification hearing officers and disciplinary hearing officers.

There are hereby created classification hearing officers and disciplinary hearing officers of the correctional system to be appointed by the commissioner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 309, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 49; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 51; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 46; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 46; Laws, 1991, ch. 360 § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 393, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 47-5-101.
Meetings and minutes of classification and disciplinary hearing officers.

The classification and disciplinary hearing officers shall maintain a record of all actions and orders by minutes. The hearing officers shall meet on a regular basis.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 309, § 1; brought forward, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 52; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 47; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 47; Laws, 1991, ch. 360, § 2; Laws, 2001, ch. 393, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 47-5-103.
Powers and duties of classification hearing officer and classification board as to classification of offenders.

The classification hearing officer shall be responsible for assigning a classification to each offender within forty (40) days after the offender’s commitment to the custody of the department. The classification shall determine the offender’s work duties, living quarters, educational, vocational or other rehabilitation programs, and privileges to be accorded the offender while in custody of the department. The classification hearing officer, in assigning classifications, shall consider the offender’s age, offense and surrounding circumstances, the complete record of the offender’s criminal history including records of law enforcement agencies or of a youth court regarding that offender’s juvenile criminal history, family background, education, practical or employment experience, interests and abilities as evidenced by mental and psychological examination and knowledge obtained by the classification hearing officer in personal interview with the offender. The classification hearing officer shall use the above criteria to assign each offender a classification which will serve and enhance the best interests and general welfare of the offender. The designee or designees of the commissioner shall approve or disapprove each classification. The classification hearing officer shall provide the State Parole Board with a copy of the classification assigned to each offender in the custody of the department who is eligible for parole.

The classification board, consisting of the commissioner, or his designee, deputy commissioner of institutions and the director of offender services may change an action of the classification or disciplinary hearing officer if the board makes a determination that the action of the hearing officer was not supported by sufficient factual information. The commissioner, in emergency situations, may suspend the classification of an offender or offenders for a period of not exceeding fifteen (15) days to relieve the emergency situation. The classification of each offender may be reviewed by a classification hearing officer at least once each year. In no case shall an offender serve as a servant in the home of any employee other than authorized by the commissioner.

The classification board shall establish substantive and procedural rules and regulations governing the assignment and alteration of inmate classifications, and shall make such rules and regulations available to any offender upon request.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 309, § 2; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 50; Laws, 1981, ch. 381, § 1; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 53; Laws, 1983, ch. 375, § 1; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 48; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 48; Laws, 1986, ch. 422, § 2; Laws, 1991, ch. 360, § 3; Laws, 1995, ch. 417, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 393, § 3; Laws, 2004, ch. 338, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 47-5-104.
Demotion of offender or forfeiture of earned time.

The commissioner shall designate a disciplinary hearing officer to hear evidence and to make decisions in all cases when an offender has been issued a rule violation report and is subject to be demoted or having earned time taken from him. All proceedings of a disciplinary hearing officer shall be taped and retained for at least three (3) years. The commissioner shall not attend any hearings whereby an offender is subject to be demoted or having earned time taken away.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 485, § 3; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 51; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 54; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 49; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 49; Laws, 1991, ch. 360 § 4; Laws, 2001, ch. 393, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 47-5-105.
Entry of bids, bills, and invoices in minutes before award or payment; copies to be sent.

The award of all contracts within the purview of the Department of Finance and Administration under Section 27-104-7 in excess of Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) entered into by the commissioner shall be approved by the Public Procurement Review Board and shall be entered on the minutes of such board before any funds shall be expended therefor. Provided further, that the entrance of the award of contracts on the minutes of the Public Procurement Review Board shall contain a detailed accounting of all bids entered showing clearly the lowest bid and best bid that was awarded in each and every case and, if the bid accepted is not the lowest, then the reasons and justification for not accepting the lowest bid shall be spread on the minutes. A true copy of the minutes of each meeting of the Public Procurement Review Board shall be sent monthly to the Governor, members of the Legislative Budget Office and Chairmen of the Corrections Committees of the Senate and the House of Representatives.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 539, § 27; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 52; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 55; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 50; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 224; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 50; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 21; Laws, 2012, ch. 388, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 355, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 47-5-107.
Cancellation of contracts.

Any contract entered into by any person, firm or corporation with the department can be cancelled, in the discretion of the commissioner, upon a finding of fact by the correctional system auditor provided for in Section 47-5-35, and entered on the minutes of the Public Procurement Review Board, that the person, firm or corporation doing business with the correctional system has violated either the published regulations of the correctional system or the laws of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 539, § 28; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 53; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 56; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 51; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 51; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 22, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1988).

§ 47-5-108.
Self-sustaining food facilities established at certain penitentiary and correctional facilities; Employee Cafeteria Funds.

The Mississippi Department of Corrections is hereby authorized to provide self-sustaining facilities for the preparation and serving of food for employees and visitors of the Mississippi State Penitentiary, the Central Mississippi Correctional Facility, and the South Mississippi Correctional Institution. The commissioner shall promulgate policies and procedures for the operation of such facilities. In addition, the funds derived from these operations shall remain in separate accounts, hereafter known as the “Employee Cafeteria Funds.” The profits, if any, shall be distributed at the direction of the Commissioner of Corrections.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 354; brought forward, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 52; Laws, 1986, ch. 358, § 2; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 52; Laws, 1989, ch. 305, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 326, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 47-5-109.
Operation of inmate canteen facilities; Canteen Fund.

The State Department of Corrections is hereby authorized to operate a facility or facilities to be known as an inmate canteen facility or facilities, the purpose of which is to make available certain goods and other items of value for purchase by offenders confined at the State Penitentiary at Parchman, offenders confined at any other facility of the department, certain employees of the department and certain persons visiting offenders or employees. The commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations for the operation of such a facility.

Any funds which may be derived from the operation of an inmate canteen facility or facilities shall be deposited into an account to be known as the Canteen Fund. For accounting purposes, certain allocated costs attributable to the operation of such a facility, and as prescribed by the rules and regulations of the board, shall be chargeable as operating costs against profits earned. These costs of operation which are chargeable shall include, but shall not be limited to, rent allocation, utility allocation and employee wages. Any net profits which may accrue from the operation of such a facility and any interest earned thereon shall be deposited into the Inmate Welfare Fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 358, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 23, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1988).

§ 47-5-109.1.
Contract for administration of inmate canteen services.

The Department of Corrections shall contract for the administration of inmate canteen services to a third party. Such contract shall comply with the procedures set forth in this section:

The Department of Corrections shall cause to be prepared a request for proposals. This request for proposals shall be prepared for distribution to any interested third party. Notice of the department’s intention to seek proposals shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation at least one time per week for three (3) weeks before closing the period for interested parties to respond. Additional forms of notice may also be used. The newspaper notice shall inform the interested parties of the service to be contracted, existence of a request for proposals, how it can be obtained, when a proposal must be submitted, and to whom the proposal must be submitted. All requests for proposals shall describe clearly what service is to be contracted, and shall fully explain the criteria upon which an evaluation of proposals shall be based. The criteria to be used for evaluations shall, at a minimum, include:

Require interested third parties to describe their qualifications to provide inmate canteen services to correctional facilities in widely dispersed geographical regions; and

Describe the department’s expectations with regard to commissions, pricing and quality assurance for inmate canteen services.

All proposals submitted by interested parties shall be evaluated by the Inmate Welfare Fund Committee, as established in Section 47-5-158, which shall apply the same criteria to all proposals when conducting an evaluation. The results and recommendations of the evaluation shall be presented to the Department of Corrections for review. All evaluations presented to the department shall be retained by the department for at least three (3) years. The department may accept or reject any recommendation of the committee, or it may conduct further inquiry into the proposals. Any further inquiry shall be clearly documented and all methods and recommendations shall be retained by the department and shall spread upon its minutes its choice of the administrator for inmate canteen services and its reasons for making the choice.

The department shall be responsible for preparing a contract that shall be in accordance with all provisions of this section and all other provisions of law. The contract shall also include a requirement that the contractor shall consent to an evaluation of its performance. Such evaluation shall occur after the first six (6) months of the contract, and shall be reviewed at times the department determines to be necessary. The contract shall clearly describe the standards upon which the contractor shall be evaluated.

The PEER Committee, at the request of the House or Senate Corrections Committee and with funds specifically appropriated by the Legislature for such purpose, shall contract with an accounting firm or with other professionals to conduct a compliance audit of the services provided by the contractor. Such audit shall review the compliance with the performance standards required for inclusion in the administrator’s contract. Such audit shall be delivered to the Legislature no later than January 1.

Contracts for the administration of inmate canteen services shall commence at the beginning of the calendar year and shall end on the last day of a calendar year. This shall not apply to contracts provided for in subsection (3) of this section.

If the Department of Corrections determines that it is necessary to not renew the contract of an administrator, or finds it necessary to terminate a contract with or without cause as provided for in the contract of the administrator of inmate canteen services, the department is authorized to select an administrator for inmate canteen services without complying with the bid requirements in subsections (1) and (2) of this section. Such contracts shall be for the balance of the calendar year in which the nonrenewal or termination occurred, and may be for an additional calendar year if the department determines that the best interests of the inmates are served by such. Any contract negotiated on an interim basis shall include a detailed transition plan which shall ensure the orderly transfer of responsibilities between contractors.

Except for contracts executed under the authority of subsection (3) of this section, the department shall select administrators of inmate canteen services at least six (6) months before the expiration of the current administrator’s contract. The period between the selection of the new administrator of inmate canteen services and the effective date of the new contract shall be known as the transition period. The Department of Corrections shall furnish the Legislature and Governor with copies of all transition plans and keep them informed of progression on such plans.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 432, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2015.